Colorado statutes. TITLE 14 Domestic Matters
ARTICLE 12
MARRIAGE COUNSELING

Section

14-12-101. Legislative declaration.

It is the declared public policy of this state to maintain desirable marital and family relations; to promote and foster the marriage relationship and reconciliation of estranged spouses; and to take reasonable measures to preserve marriages, particularly where minor children are involved, in the interest of strengthening the family life foundation of our society, and in reducing the economic and social costs to the state resulting from broken homes. In furtherance of this policy, it is the purpose of this article to make competent marriage counseling services available through the district courts of the state to spouses involved in domestic difficulties.

Source:

L. 60:

p. 131, § 1.

CRS 53:

§ 46-5-1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 46-5-1.

14-12-102. Domestic relations counselor - assistants - term.

Subject to the provisions of section 13-3-105, C.R.S., the chief judge of any judicial district may appoint one or more domestic relations counselors and such other persons as assistants and clerks as may be deemed necessary to serve during the pleasure of the appointing power.

Source:

L. 60:

p. 131, § 1.

CRS 53:

§ 46-5-2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 46-5-2.

L. 79:

Entire section R&RE, p. 602, § 29, effective July 1.

L. 80:

Entire section amended, p. 519, § 1, effective January 29.

14-12-103. Offices - qualifications - salaries. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 60:

p. 132, § 1.

CRS 53:

§ 46-5-3.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 46-5-3.

L. 79:

Entire section repealed, p. 602, § 30, effective July 1.

14-12-104. Duties of domestic relations counselors.

Domestic relations counselors shall, under the supervision of and as directed by the judge of the district court in which they are serving, perform the following duties:

Promptly consider all requests for counseling for the purpose of disposing of such requests pursuant to this article;

Counsel husband or wife or both under a schedule of fees set by the judge of the district court wherein the case is heard, said fee to be paid by either the husband or wife or jointly by the husband and wife, as determined by the court, whether or not a petition for dissolution of marriage, declaration of invalidity of marriage, or legal separation has been filed, if the spouses have marital difficulties which may lead to a termination of the marriage relationship;

If, in the judgment of the counselor, prolonged counseling is necessary or if it appears that medical, psychiatric, or religious assistance is indicated, refer the husband or wife or both to a physician, psychiatrist, psychologist, social service agency, or clergyman of any religious denomination to which the parties may belong.

Source:

L. 60:

p. 132, § 1.

CRS 53:

§ 46-5-4.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 46-5-4.

14-12-105. Counseling proceedings to be private - communications confidential.

All counseling proceedings, interviews, or conferences shall be held in private. All communications, oral or written, from the parties to a domestic relations counselor in a counseling or conciliation proceedings shall be deemed to be made to such counsel in official confidence by a privileged communication and shall not be admissible or usable for any purpose in any dissolution of marriage hearing or any other proceedings. Any papers or records of the counselor relating to counseling proceedings under this article shall be confidential.

Source:

L. 60:

p. 133, § 1.

CRS 53:

§ 46-5-6.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 46-5-6.

Cross references:

For other privileged communications, see §§ 13-90-107 and 13-90-108.

14-12-106. Court may appoint marriage counselor in any county or judicial district where the population is under one hundred thousand. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 60:

p. 133, § 1.

CRS 53:

§ 46-5-7.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 46-5-7.

L. 79:

Entire section repealed, p. 602, § 30, effective July 1.